Washington statutes.
RCW 2.36.170

Failure of juror to appear—Penalty.

A person summoned for jury service who intentionally fails to appear as directed shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1988 c 188 s 14.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1988 c 188: See notes following RCW 2.36.010.